Utah statutes.
65A-7-6.   Lease covenants.

Each surface lease shall contain the following covenants:

(1)  the lessee shall promptly pay the rent annually in advance;

(2)  no waste shall be committed on the land;

(3)  the premises shall be surrendered at the expiration of the term;

(4)  the lessee may not sublet or assign without the written consent of the division;

(5)  a failure to pay the agreed rent for a period of one month from the time rent is due shall result in a forfeiture of the lease after notice; and

(6)  if improvements have been placed on the land by any person other than the lessee, the lessee shall allow the owner of the improvements to remove them within 90 days.

